Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2912
Restorative justice or dispute resolution process; procedures.

Before the restorative justice or dispute resolution process begins, an approved center shall provide the parties with a written statement setting forth the procedures to be followed.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 10.